Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4867.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5474. (1) The department shall establish a lead poisoning prevention program that has the following components: (a) A coordinated and comprehensive plan to prevent childhood lead poisoning and to minimize exposure of the general public to lead-based paint hazards. (b) A comprehensive educational and community outreach program regarding lead poisoning prevention that shall, must, at a minimum, include the development of appropriate educational materials targeted to health care providers, child care providers, public schools, owners and tenants of residential dwellings, and parents of young children. These educational materials shall must be made available, upon on request, to local and state community groups, legal services organizations, and tenants' groups. (c) A technical assistance system for health care providers to assist those providers in managing cases of childhood lead poisoning. As part of this system, the department shall require that results of all blood lead level tests conducted in Michigan this state be reported to the department as provided for in by rule and that when the department receives notice of an elevated blood lead levels above 10 micrograms per deciliter, level, it shall initiate contact with the local public health department or the physician, or both, of the child whose blood lead level exceeds 10 micrograms per deciliter. with the elevated blood lead level. A local health department or physician who is notified of a child less than 3 years of age with an elevated blood lead level shall refer that child to the Early On program administered by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (2) The By July 1 of each year, the department shall report to the legislature by January 1, 1999, and annually thereafter, the number of children through less than 6 years of age 6 who were screened for lead poisoning during the preceding fiscal year and who were confirmed to have had elevated blood lead levels. above 10 micrograms per deciliter. The report shall must compare these rates with those of previous fiscal years and the department shall recommend methods for improving compliance with guidelines issued by the federal centers for disease control and prevention, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, including any necessary legislation or appropriations. (3) Not more than 1 year after the effective date of this part, and annually thereafter, By July 1 of each year, the department shall prepare a written report regarding the expenditures under the lead poisoning prevention program, including the amounts and sources of money from the previous preceding fiscal year and a complete accounting of its use. The report shall must be given to the appropriate committees of the legislature and be made available to the general public upon on request.